Nevada, session 83, SB154.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 483 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. On or before October 1 of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Prepare a report which includes:
(1) The number of Real IDs issued by the Department
during the immediately preceding fiscal year to persons who did
not previously have a Real ID.
(2) The total cost to the Department to issue Real IDs
during the immediately preceding fiscal year which was not
covered by fees charged to applicants.
(3) The sources of money used to cover the costs described
in subparagraph (2).
(b) Submit the report to the Governor and to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature.
2. As used in this section, “Real ID” means a driver’s license,
commercial driver’s license or identification card which is issued
pursuant to the standards established by 6 C.F.R. Part 37,
Subparts A to E, inclusive, and which contains a security mark
approved by the United States Department of Homeland Security
in accordance with 6 C.F.R. § 37.17.
Sec. 2. NRS 483.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.410 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection]
subsections 6 and 8 and NRS 483.330 and 483.417, for every
driver’s license, including a motorcycle driver’s license, issued and
service performed, the following fees must be charged:

An original or renewal license issued to a person
65 years of age or older ............................................ $13.50
An original or renewal license issued to any
person less than 65 years of age which
expires on the eighth anniversary of the
licensee’s birthday ...................................................... 37.00
-
*SB154*

– 3 –
An original or renewal license issued to any
person less than 65 years of age which
expires on or before the fourth anniversary of
the licensee’s birthday .............................................. $18.50
Administration of the examination required by
NRS 483.330 for a noncommercial driver’s
license ......................................................................... 25.00
Each readministration to the same person of the
examination required by NRS 483.330 for a
noncommercial driver’s license ................................. 10.00
Reinstatement of a license after suspension,
revocation or cancellation, except a
revocation for a violation of NRS 484C.110,
484C.120, 484C.130 or 484C.430, or
pursuant to NRS 484C.210 and 484C.220 ................. 75.00
Reinstatement of a license after revocation for a
violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120,
484C.130 or 484C.430, or pursuant to NRS
484C.210 and 484C.220 ........................................... 120.00
A new photograph, change of name, change of
other information, except address, or any
combination .................................................................. 5.00
A duplicate license .......................................................... 14.00

2. For every motorcycle endorsement to a driver’s license, a
fee of $5 must be charged.
3. If no other change is requested or required, the Department
shall not charge a fee to convert the number of a license from the
licensee’s social security number, or a number that was formulated
by using the licensee’s social security number as a basis for the
number, to a unique number that is not based on the licensee’s social
security number.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.417, the increase
in fees authorized by NRS 483.347 and the fees charged pursuant to
NRS 483.415 must be paid in addition to the fees charged pursuant
to subsections 1 and 2.
5. A penalty of $10 must be paid by each person renewing a
license after it has expired for a period of 30 days or more as
provided in NRS 483.386 unless the person is exempt pursuant to
that section.
6. The Department may not charge a fee for the reinstatement
of a driver’s license that has been:
(a) Voluntarily surrendered for medical reasons; or
(b) Cancelled pursuant to NRS 483.310.
-
*SB154*

– 4 –
7. All fees and penalties are payable to the Administrator at the
time a license or a renewal license is issued.
8. If no other change is requested or required, the
Department shall not charge a fee to replace a driver’s license that
is not a Real ID with a driver’s license that is a Real ID. During
any other transaction which requires the Department to issue a
driver’s license, including, without limitation, an application for
an original, renewal or duplicate license or for a change of the
information that appears on a license, the Department shall not
charge any fee to issue a Real ID that is in addition to the fee
charged for the underlying transaction.
9. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.340, subsection 3
of NRS 483.3485, NRS 483.415 and 483.840, and subsection 3 of
NRS 483.863, all money collected by the Department pursuant to
this chapter must be deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the
Motor Vehicle Fund.
10. As used in this section, “Real ID” means a driver’s
license which is issued pursuant to the standards established by 6
C.F.R. Part 37, Subparts A to E, inclusive, and which contains a
security mark approved by the United States Department of
Homeland Security in accordance with 6 C.F.R. § 37.17.
Sec. 3. NRS 483.820 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.820 1. A person who applies for an identification card in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 483.810 to 483.890,
inclusive, and who is not ineligible to receive an identification card
pursuant to NRS 483.861, is entitled to receive an identification card
if the person is:
(a) A resident of this State and is 10 years of age or older and
does not hold a valid driver’s license or identification card from any
state or jurisdiction; or
(b) A seasonal resident who does not hold a valid Nevada
driver’s license.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4 and
NRS 483.825, the Department shall charge and collect the following
fees for the issuance of an original, duplicate or changed
identification card:

An original or duplicate identification card issued to a
person 65 years of age or older which expires on
or before the fourth anniversary of the person’s
birthday ........................................................................... $4
An original or duplicate identification card issued to a
person 65 years of age or older which expires on
or before the eighth anniversary of the person’s
birthday ............................................................................. 8
-
*SB154*

– 5 –
An original or duplicate identification card issued to a
person under 18 years of age which expires on the
eighth anniversary of the person’s birthday .................... $6
A renewal of an identification card for a person under
18 years of age which expires on the eighth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ................................. 6
An original or duplicate identification card issued to a
person under 18 years of age which expires on or
before the fourth anniversary of the person’s
birthday ............................................................................. 3
A renewal of an identification card for a person under
18 years of age which expires on or before the
fourth anniversary of the person’s birthday ...................... 3
An original or duplicate identification card issued to
any person at least 18 years of age, but less than
65 years of age, which expires on the eighth
anniversary of the person’s birthday ............................... 18
A renewal of an identification card for any person at
least 18 years of age, but less than 65 years of age,
which expires on the eighth anniversary of the
person’s birthday ............................................................. 18
An original or duplicate identification card issued to
any person at least 18 years of age, but less than
65 years of age, which expires on or before the
fourth anniversary of the person’s birthday ...................... 9
A renewal of an identification card for any person at
least 18 years of age, but less than 65 years of age,
which expires on or before the fourth anniversary
of the person’s birthday ..................................................... 9
A new photograph or change of name, or both ...................... 4

3. The Department shall not charge a fee for:
(a) An identification card issued to a person who has voluntarily
surrendered his or her driver’s license pursuant to NRS 483.420; or
(b) A renewal of an identification card for a person 65 years of
age or older.
4. If no other change is requested or required, the
Department shall not charge a fee to replace an identification card
that is not a Real ID with an identification card that is a Real ID.
During any other transaction which requires the Department to
issue an identification card, including, without limitation, an
application for an original, renewal or duplicate identification
card or for a change of the information that appears on an
identification card, the Department shall not charge any fee to
-
*SB154*

– 6 –
issue a Real ID that is in addition to the fee charged for the
underlying transaction.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.825, the increase
in fees authorized in NRS 483.347 must be paid in addition to the
fees charged pursuant to this section.
[5.] 6. As used in this section [, “photograph”] :
(a) “Photograph” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 483.125.
(b) “Real ID” means an identification card which is issued
pursuant to the standards established by 6 C.F.R. Part 37,
Subparts A to E, inclusive, and which contains a security mark
approved by the United States Department of Homeland Security
in accordance with 6 C.F.R. § 37.17.
Sec. 4. NRS 483.910 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.910 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
7, the Department shall charge and collect the following fees:

For an original commercial driver’s license
which expires on or before the eighth
anniversary of the date of issuance of the
license but after the fourth anniversary of the
date of issuance of the license ..................................... $108
For an original commercial driver’s license or
commercial learner’s permit which expires
on or before the fourth anniversary of the
birthday of the licensee or permit holder......................... 54
For renewal of a commercial driver’s license
which expires on or before the eighth
anniversary of the date of issuance of the
license but after the fourth anniversary of the
date of issuance of the license ....................................... 108
For renewal of a commercial driver’s license or
commercial learner’s permit which expires
on or before the fourth anniversary of the
birthday of the licensee or permit holder......................... 54
For reinstatement of a commercial driver’s
license after suspension or revocation of the
license for a violation of NRS 484C.110,
484C.120, 484C.130 or 484C.430, or
pursuant to NRS 484C.210 and 484C.220, or
pursuant to 49 C.F.R. § 383.51(b)(1) to (4) .................. 145
-
*SB154*

– 7 –
For reinstatement of a commercial driver’s
license after suspension, revocation,
cancellation or disqualification of the license,
except a suspension or revocation for a
violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120,
484C.130 or 484C.430, or pursuant to NRS
484C.210 and 484C.220, or pursuant to 49
C.F.R. § 383.51(b)(1) to (4) ........................................ $110
For a duplicate commercial driver’s license ......................... 19
For any change of information on a commercial
driver’s license .................................................................. 9
For each endorsement added after the issuance
of an original commercial driver’s license ...................... 14
For the administration of a driving skills test for
the issuance, renewal or transfer of a
commercial driver’s license or to change any
information on, or add an endorsement to, an
existing commercial driver’s license ............................... 30

2. The Department shall charge and collect an annual fee of
$555 from each person who is authorized by the Department to
administer a driving skills test pursuant to NRS 483.912.
3. An additional charge of $3 must be charged for each
knowledge test administered to a person who has twice failed the
test.
4. An additional charge of $25 must be charged for each
driving skills test administered to a person who has twice failed the
test.
5. The increase in fees authorized in NRS 483.347 must be
paid in addition to the fees charged pursuant to this section.
6. The Department shall charge an applicant for a hazardous
materials endorsement an additional fee for the processing of
fingerprints. The Department shall establish the additional fee by
regulation, except that the amount of the additional fee must not
exceed the sum of the amount charged by the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History and each applicable federal
agency to process the fingerprints for a background check of the
applicant in accordance with Section 1012 of the Uniting and
Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to
Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act (USA PATRIOT ACT) of
2001, 49 U.S.C. § 5103a.
7. If no other change is requested or required, the
Department shall not charge a fee to replace a commercial
driver’s license that is not a Real ID with a commercial driver’s
license that is a Real ID. During any other transaction which
-
*SB154*

– 8 –
requires the Department to issue a commercial driver’s license,
including, without limitation, an application for an original,
renewal or duplicate license or for a change of the information
that appears on a license, the Department shall not charge any fee
to issue a Real ID that is in addition to the fee charged for the
underlying transaction.
8. As used in this section, “Real ID” means a commercial
driver’s license which is issued pursuant to the standards
established by 6 C.F.R. Part 37, Subparts A to E, inclusive, and
which contains a security mark approved by the United States
Department of Homeland Security in accordance with 6 C.F.R. §
37.17.
Sec. 5. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB154*